Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [142F.121] MINNESOTA SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Purpose. new text end new text begin The Minnesota supplemental nutrition assistance program (MNSNAP) serves adults and children who are at significant risk of hunger due to federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) cuts and restrictions. MNSNAP seeks to solve the crisis created by ending federal food benefits to veterans, seniors, Minnesotans experiencing homelessness, youth aging out of foster care, new Americans, and working parents who have experienced a job loss. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin Minnesotans who were or would have been eligible for federal SNAP as of June 30, 2025, are eligible for MNSNAP. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Food benefits continuation. new text end new text begin (a) When a participant is determined eligible for MNSNAP, food assistance benefits must continue. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must determine the most appropriate and efficient state-funded mechanism and county process to continue benefits for participants. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Assessment. new text end new text begin (a) Within 30 days of a participant's enrollment in MNSNAP, the county or Tribal agency or state-approved navigator must meet face-to-face with the participant. The commissioner must ensure that the face-to-face meeting occurs. new text end new text begin (b) During the face-to-face meeting under paragraph (a), the county or Tribal agency or state-approved navigator must: new text end new text begin (1) determine whether the participant's loss of federal SNAP benefits may be explained by advanced age, illness, injury, violence, addiction, disability, homelessness, veteran status, or a recent exit from the foster care system; new text end new text begin (2) determine whether the participant is eligible for an exemption under Code of Federal Regulations, title 7, section 273.24; new text end new text begin (3) assist the participant in obtaining a current assessment by a behavioral health or medical professional to identify any barriers to the participant's consistent compliance with the requirements of Code of Federal Regulations, title 7, section 273.24; and new text end new text begin (4) identify available resources that may assist a participant who is attempting to meet the requirements of Code of Federal Regulations, title 7, section 273.24. new text end new text begin (c) If the participant does not attend the face-to-face meeting, the county or Tribal agency or state-approved navigator must attempt at least one home visit. new text end new text begin (d) If a face-to-face meeting is not conducted and the home visit attempt is unsuccessful, the county or Tribal agency or state-approved navigator must send the participant a written notice that provides information on MNSNAP. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Exiting MNSNAP. new text end new text begin (a) Based on the assessment under subdivision 4, if the county or Tribal agency or state-approved navigator determines a participant is eligible for a federal exemption under Code of Federal Regulations, title 7, section 273.24, the participant must exit MNSNAP and convert to receive federal SNAP benefits. new text end new text begin (b) Based on the assessment under subdivision 4, if the county or Tribal agency or state-approved navigator determines a participant can consistently meet the federal requirements in Code of Federal Regulations, title 7, section 273.24, the participant must exit MNSNAP and convert to receive federal SNAP benefits. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Moratorium. new text end new text begin Beginning July 1, 2026, the commissioner must enact an emergency moratorium on the termination of food assistance for Minnesotans experiencing new federal SNAP restrictions implemented after July 1, 2025, where there is no current medical, behavioral health, or vocational assessment indicating a participant's ability to consistently comply with the federal requirements in Code of Federal Regulations, title 7, section 273.24. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for the Minnesota supplemental nutrition assistance program (MNSNAP) under Minnesota Statutes, section 142F.121. new text end